Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-1311
Prohibited acts; penalty.

Any person who knowingly or intentionally attempts to avoid the application of a setoff under the Gambling Winnings Setoff for Outstanding Debt Act by passing any applicable winnings to another person to present for a cash payout or by providing fraudulent identification during a cash payout is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 43.